New Jersey, session 222, S73.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1944, c.255 (C.43:16A-1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    As used in this act: (1)   "Retirement system" or "system" shall mean the Police and Firemen's Retirement System of New Jersey as defined in section 2 of this act. (2)   (a)   "Policeman" shall mean a permanent, full-time employee of a law enforcement unit as defined in section 2 of P.L.1961, c.56 (C.52:17B-67) or the State, other than an officer or trooper of the Division of State Police whose position is covered by the State Police Retirement System, whose primary duties include the investigation, apprehension or detention of persons suspected or convicted of violating the criminal laws of the State and who: (i)    is authorized to carry a firearm while engaged in the actual performance of his official duties; (ii)   has police powers; (iii)   is required to complete successfully the training requirements prescribed by P.L.1961, c.56 (C.52:17B-66 et seq.) or comparable training requirements as determined by the board of trustees; and (iv)   is subject to the physical and mental fitness requirements applicable to the position of municipal police officer established by an agency authorized to establish these requirements on a Statewide basis, or comparable physical and mental fitness requirements as determined by the board of trustees. The term shall also include an administrative or supervisory employee of a law enforcement unit or the State whose duties include general or direct supervision of employees engaged in investigation, apprehension or detention activities or training responsibility for these employees and a requirement for engagement in investigation, apprehension or detention activities if necessary, and who is authorized to carry a firearm while in the actual performance of his official duties and has police powers. (b)   "Fireman" shall mean a permanent, full-time employee of a firefighting unit whose primary duties include the control and extinguishment of fires and who is subject to the training and physical and mental fitness requirements applicable to the position of municipal firefighter established by an agency authorized to establish these requirements on a Statewide basis, or comparable training and physical and mental fitness requirements as determined by the board of trustees.  The term shall also include an administrative or supervisory employee of a firefighting unit whose duties include general or direct supervision of employees engaged in fire control and extinguishment activities or training responsibility for these employees and a requirement for engagement in fire control and extinguishment activities if necessary.  As used in this paragraph, "firefighting unit" shall mean a municipal fire department, a fire district, or an agency of a county or the State which is responsible for control and extinguishment of fires. (3)   "Member" shall mean any policeman or fireman included in the membership of the retirement system pursuant to this amendatory and supplementary act, P.L.1989, c.204 (C.43:16A-15.6 et al.). (4)   "Board of trustees" or "board" shall mean the board provided for in section 13 of this act. (5)   "Medical board" shall mean the board of physicians provided for in section 13 of this act. (6)   "Employer" shall mean the State of New Jersey, the county, municipality or political subdivision thereof which pays the particular policeman or fireman. (7)   "Service" shall mean service as a policeman or fireman paid for by an employer. (8)   "Creditable service" shall mean service rendered for which credit is allowed as provided under section 4 of this act. (9)   "Regular interest" shall mean interest as determined by the State Treasurer, after consultation with the actuary.  It shall bear a reasonable relationship to the percentage rate of earnings on investments based on the market value of assets but shall not exceed the assumed percentage rate of increase applied to salaries plus 3%, provided however that the board of trustees shall not set the average percentage rate of increase applied to salaries below 6%.  This rate shall be distinct from any internally targeted rates used for developing investment policy by the board of trustees pursuant to section 13 of P.L.1944, c.255 (C.43:16A-13). (10)  "Aggregate contributions" shall mean the sum of all the amounts, deducted from the compensation of a member or contributed by him or on his behalf, standing to the credit of his individual account in the annuity savings fund. (11)  "Annuity" shall mean payments for life derived from the aggregate contributions of a member. (12)  "Pension" shall mean payments for life derived from contributions by the employer. (13)  "Retirement allowance" shall mean the pension plus the annuity. (14)  "Earnable compensation" shall mean the full rate of the salary that would be payable to an employee if he worked the full normal working time for his position.  In cases where salary includes maintenance, the retirement system shall fix the value of that part of the salary not paid in money which shall be considered under this act. (15)  "Average final compensation" shall mean final compensation. (16)  "Retirement" shall mean the termination of the member's active service with a retirement allowance granted and paid under the provisions of this act. (17)  "Annuity reserve" shall mean the present value of all payments to be made on account of any annuity or benefit in lieu of any annuity computed upon the basis of such mortality tables recommended by the actuary as shall be adopted by the board of trustees, and regular interest. (18)  "Pension reserve" shall mean the present value of all payments to be made on account of any pension or benefit in lieu of any pension computed upon the basis of such mortality tables recommended by the actuary as shall be adopted by the board of trustees, and regular interest. (19)  "Actuarial equivalent" shall mean a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of such mortality tables recommended by the actuary as shall be adopted by the board of trustees, and regular interest. (20)  "Beneficiary" shall mean any person receiving a retirement allowance or other benefit as provided by this act. (21)  "Child" shall mean a deceased member's or retirant's unmarried child (a) under the age of 18, or (b) 18 years of age or older and enrolled in a secondary school, or (c) under the age of 24 and enrolled in a degree program in an institution of higher education for at least 12 credit hours in each semester, provided that the member died in active service as a result of an accident met in the actual performance of duty at some definite time and place, and the death was not the result of the member's willful misconduct, or (d) of any age who, at the time of the member's or retirant's death, is disabled because of an intellectual disability or physical incapacity, is unable to do any substantial, gainful work because of the impairment and his impairment has lasted or can be expected to last for a continuous period of not less than 12 months, as affirmed by the medical board. (22)  "Parent" shall mean the parent of a member who was receiving at least one-half of his support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death.  The dependency of such a parent will be considered terminated by marriage of the parent subsequent to the death of the member. (23)  (a)   "Widower," for employees of the State, means the man to whom a member or retirant was married, or a domestic partner as defined in section 3 of P.L.2003, c.246 (C.26:8A-3), on the date of her death [and who has not since remarried or established a domestic partnership. In the event of the payment of accidental death benefits, pursuant to section 10 of P.L.1944, c.255 (C.43:16A-10), the restriction concerning remarriage or establishment of a domestic partnership shall be waived]. (b)   Subject to the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection, "widower," for employees of public employers other than the State, means the man to whom a member or retirant was married on the date of her death [and who has not remarried]. (c)   A public employer other than the State may adopt a resolution providing that the term "widower" as defined in paragraph (b) of this subsection shall include domestic partners as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection. (24)    (a)     "Widow," for employees of the State, means the woman to whom a member or retirant was married, or a domestic partner as defined in section 3 of P.L.2003, c.246 (C.26:8A-3), on the date of his death [and who has not since remarried or established a domestic partnership.  In the event of the payment of accidental death benefits, pursuant to section 10 of P.L.1944, c.255 (C.43:16A-10), the restriction concerning remarriage or establishment of a domestic partnership shall be waived]. (b)   Subject to the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection, "widow," for employees of public employers other than the State, means the woman to whom a member or retirant was married on the date of his death [and who has not remarried]. (c)   A public employer other than the State may adopt a resolution providing that the term "widow" as defined in paragraph (b) of this subsection shall include domestic partners as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection. (25)  "Fiscal year" shall mean any year commencing with July 1, and ending with June 30, next following. (26)    (a)     "Compensation" shall mean the base salary, for services as a member as defined in this act, which is in accordance with established salary policies of the member's employer for all employees in the same position but shall not include individual salary adjustments which are granted primarily in anticipation of the member's retirement or additional remuneration for performing temporary duties beyond the regular workday. (b)   In the case of a person who becomes a member of the retirement system on or after the effective date of P.L.2010, c.1, "compensation" means the amount of base salary equivalent to the annual maximum wage contribution base for Social Security, pursuant to the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, for services as a member as defined in this act, which is in accordance with established salary policies of the member's employer for all employees in the same position but shall not include individual salary adjustments which are granted primarily in anticipation of the member's retirement or additional remuneration for performing temporary duties beyond the regular workday. (27)  "Department" shall mean any police or fire department of a municipality or a fire department of a fire district located in a township or a county police or park police department or the appropriate department of the State or instrumentality thereof. (28)    (a)     "Final compensation" means the compensation received by the member in the last 12 months of creditable service preceding his retirement or death. (b)   In the case of a person who becomes a member of the retirement system on or after the effective date of P.L.2010, c.1, "final compensation" means the average annual compensation for service for which contributions are made during any three fiscal years of membership providing the largest possible benefit to the member or the member's beneficiary. (29)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1992, c.78). (30)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1992, c.78). (31)  (a)   "Spouse," for employees of the State, means the husband or wife, or domestic partner as defined in section 3 of P.L.2003, c.246 (C.26:8A-3), of a member. (b)   Subject to the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection, "spouse," for employees of public employers other than the State, means the husband or wife of a member. (c)   A public employer other than the State may adopt a resolution providing that the term "spouse" as defined in paragraph (b) of this subsection shall include domestic partners as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection. (cf: P.L.2018, c.55, s.7) 2.    Section 9 of P.L.1944, c.255 (C.43:16A-9) is amended to read as follows: 9.    (1)     Upon the receipt of proper proof of the death of a member in active service on account of which no accidental death benefit is payable under section 10 there shall be paid to such member's widow or widower a pension of 50% of final compensation for the use of himself or herself and children of the deceased member[, to continue during his or her widowhood]; if there is no surviving widow or widower or in the case the widow or widower dies [or remarries], 50% of final compensation shall be payable to one surviving child or, if there are two or more children, 50% of final compensation shall be payable to such children in equal shares. In the event of death occurring in the first year of creditable service, the benefits, payable pursuant to this subsection, shall be computed at the annual rate of compensation. If there is no widow or widower or child, 25% of final compensation will be payable to one surviving parent or 40% of final compensation will be payable to two surviving parents in equal shares. (2)   If there is no widow or widower, child or parent, there shall be paid to any other beneficiary of the deceased member his or her aggregate contributions at the time of death. (3)   In no case shall the death benefit provided in subsection (1) be less than that provided under subsection (2). (4)   In addition to the foregoing benefits payable under subsection (1) or (2), there shall also be paid in one sum to the member's beneficiary, an amount equal to 3 1/2 times final compensation. (5)   a.   For the purposes of this section and paragraph (5) of section 10 of P.L.1944, c.255 (C.43:16A-10), a member of the Police and Firemen's Retirement System shall be deemed to be an active member for a period of no more than 93 days while on official leave of absence without pay when such leave is due to any reason other than illness, and for a period of not more than one year in the event of an official leave (a) due to the member's maternity, or (b) to fulfill a residency requirement for an advanced degree, or (c) as a full-time student at an institution of higher education, and (1) while he is disabled due to sickness or injury arising out of or in the course of his employment as a member to whom this act applies, is not engaged in any gainful occupation, and is receiving or entitled to receive periodic benefits (including any commutation of, or substitute for, such benefits) for loss of time on account of such disability under or by reason of workmen's compensation law, occupational disease law or similar legislation and has not retired or terminated his membership; or (2) for a period of no more than two years while on official leave of absence without pay if satisfactory evidence is presented to the retirement system that such leave of absence without pay is due to the member's personal illness other than an illness to which (1) above applies. b.    If a member dies within 30 days after the date of retirement or the date of board approval, whichever is later, a death benefit shall be payable only if he is deemed to be an active member in accordance with this section; provided, however, a member applying for disability benefits shall be deemed an active member if he was covered by the death benefit provisions of the act at the termination of employment, filed the application for disability retirement with the retirement system within 30 days following such termination of employment and dies within 30 days after the date of retirement or the date of board approval, whichever is later.  If a member files an application for disability retirement while in service and otherwise meets the requirements for disability retirement, but dies before the retirement takes effect, the retirement shall be considered effective. (cf: P.L.2019, c.305, s.5) 3.    (New section)    Any person who was married to or had a domestic partnership with a member who died and who subsequently became ineligible to receive the death benefit payable pursuant to section 9 of P.L.1944, c.255 (C.43:16A-9) because of remarriage prior to the effective date of this act, P.L.   , c.   (C.   ) (now pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall be reclassified as a widow or widower as of the effective date of this act and eligible for the pension from the effective date forward. 4.    Section 26 of P.L.1967, c.250 (C.43:16A-12.1) is amended to read as follows: 26.  a.   Upon the death after retirement of any member of the retirement system there shall be paid to the member's widow or widower a pension of 50% of final compensation for the use of herself or himself[, to continue during her or his widowhood], plus 15% of such compensation payable to one surviving child or an additional 25% of such compensation to two or more children; if there is no surviving widow or widower or in the case the widow or widower dies [or remarries], 20% of final compensation will be payable to one surviving child, 35% of such compensation to two surviving children in equal shares and if there be three or more children, 50% of such compensation would be payable to such children in equal shares. b.    The increased pension benefits payable under this act shall apply only to cases where such policeman or fireman retirees on or after December 18, 1967 and shall not affect pensions paid or to be paid as a result of retirements occurring prior to said date.  The increased pension benefits payable under this subsection of this 1991 amendatory and supplementary act shall apply only to pension benefits payable on or after the effective date of this 1991 amendatory and supplementary act, P.L.1991, c.511 (C.43:3B-8.4 et al.). c.     As of the effective date of this 1991 amendatory and supplementary act, P.L.1991, c.511 (C.43:3B-8.4 et al.), all widows' and widowers' pensions previously granted or to be granted pursuant to the provisions of subsection a. of this section or section 10 of chapter 255 of the laws of 1944, as amended, and all such pensions previously granted, or to be granted where retirement for accidental disability occurred prior to December 18, 1967, pursuant to the provisions of section 7(3) of chapter 255 of the laws of 1944 prior to the amendment of that section by P.L.1967, c.250, will be subject to a minimum, annual, aggregate payment of $4,500.  The increased pension benefits payable under this subsection of this 1991 amendatory and supplementary act shall apply only to pension benefits on or after the effective date of this 1991 amendatory and supplementary act, P.L.1991, c.511 (C.43:3B-8.4 et al.). d.    The State shall reimburse local governments for additional pension costs arising from any increase in the annual pension payable to a widow or widower pursuant to this section of this 1991 amendatory and supplementary act, P.L.1991, c.511 (C.43:3B-8.4 et al.). (cf: P.L.1999, c.428, s.7) 5.    (New section)   Any person who was married to or had a domestic partnership with a member who died and who subsequently became ineligible to receive the death benefit payable pursuant to section 26 of P.L.1967, c.250 (C.43:16A-12.1) because of remarriage prior to the effective date of this act, P.L.   , c.   (C.   ) (now pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall be reclassified as a widow or widower as of the effective date of this act and eligible for the pension from the effective date forward. 6.    (New section)    The State shall reimburse employers other than the State for additional costs arising from any increase in the pension benefits payable to a widow, widower or domestic partner pursuant to this act, P.L.   , c.   (C.   ) (now pending before the Legislature as this bill). 7.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT A law enacted in 2003 eliminated the termination of Police and Firemen's Retirement System (PFRS) accidental death benefits received by a surviving spouse or domestic partner upon remarriage or the establishment of a new domestic partnership.  This bill would ensure that all surviving PFRS spouses or partners are treated the same by providing that the eligibility of any survivors pension will not terminate under these circumstances.  The bill also restores the survivors pension to those who lost this benefit because of remarriage prior to the enactment of this bill. Under the PFRS, when a member of the system dies in active service, the widow or widower is eligible to receive a survivorship benefit consisting of a pension equal to 50 percent of the compensation upon which contributions by the member were based in the last year of creditable service, to continue during her or his widowhood.  If there is no survivor or in the case of death or remarriage, there is also paid 20 percent of final compensation to one surviving child or 35 percent of final compensation to two surviving children or 50 percent such compensation in equal shares. In the event of death after retirement, the surviving spouse is eligible to receive a survivorship pension consisting of a pension equal to 50 percent of final compensation, to continue during her or his widowhood, and there will also be paid 15 percent of such compensation to one surviving child or an additional 25 percent of such compensation to two or more children.  If there is no surviving widow or widower or in case the widow or widower dies or remarries, the payments equal 20 percent of final compensation payable to one surviving child, 35 percent of such compensation to two surviving children in equal shares and if there are three or more children, 50 percent of such compensation in equal shares. Currently, the surviving spouse or partner ceases to be eligible for these survivors pensions upon remarriage or the establishment of another domestic partnership.  This bill would ensure that these survivors benefits do not terminate.